Illinois, session 104th, SB2686.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Energy 5Production Zones Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act: 7    "Commercial solar energy system" means any device or 8assembly of devices that (i) is ground installed and (ii) uses 9solar energy from the sun for generating electricity for the 10primary purpose of wholesale or retail sale and not primarily 11for consumption on the property on which the device or devices 12reside. 13    "Electric generation facility" means a facility or 14infrastructure associated with a facility for the generation 15of electricity. "Electric generation facility" does not 16include a wind power device or a commercial solar energy 17system. 18    "Energy production zone" means a premise of land on which 19either of the following was located as of January 1, 2026:20        (1) an electric generation facility with a generating 21    capacity of at least 80 megawatts, regardless of whether 22    the electric generation facility is operational; or 23        (2) a surface or underground mine at which mining   SB2686- 2 -LRB104 14637 AAS 27779 b1    operations are no longer occurring. 2"Energy production zone" does not include a premise of land on 3which one or more wind power devices that are integrated into 4an electric generation facility or one or more commercial 5solar energy systems were located as of January 1, 2026. 6    "Local authority" means any agency, officer, board, or 7commission of a unit of local government that may issue a 8permit or an approval of a land use for the construction of a 9development, a building, or another structure. 10    "Permit" means any of the following: 11        (1) an improvement location permit; 12        (2) a building permit; 13        (3) a certificate of occupancy; 14        (4) an approval of a site-specific development plan; 15        (5) an approval of a primary or secondary plat; 16        (6) an approval of a variance, contingent use, 17    conditional use, special exception, or special use; or 18        (7) an approval of a planned unit of local government 19    development. 20    "Premise of land" means property comprising a tract of 21land on which a project owner proposes to construct an 22electric generation facility, including land within the 23perimeter of the tract of land that was not owned by the 24project owner as of January 1, 2026. 25    "Project owner" means a person that proposes to construct 26an electric generation facility.   SB2686- 3 -LRB104 14637 AAS 27779 b1    "Retail electric service" means electric service furnished 2to a customer, including a residential, commercial, or 3industrial customer, for consumption by the customer. "Retail 4electric service" does not include wholesale electric service. 5    "Wholesale electric service" means the provision of 6electricity to another person for resale, including in 7wholesale markets. 8    "Wind power device" means a device, including a windmill 9or a wind turbine, that is designed to use the kinetic energy 10of moving air to provide mechanical energy or to produce 11electricity. 12    Section 10. Electric generation facility permit. 13    (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 14contrary, a project owner is not required to obtain a permit or 15any other land use or zoning approval from a local authority 16for the construction of an electric generation facility if: 17        (1) the Illinois Commerce Commission grants the 18    project owner a certificate under Section 8-406 of the 19    Public Utilities Act for the construction, the Commission 20    declines jurisdiction over the construction under Section 21    8-406 of the Public Utilities Act, or the electric 22    generation facility files notice with the Commission to 23    not use a certificate under Section 8-406 of the Public 24    Utilities Act; 25        (2) the electric generating facility will be located   SB2686- 4 -LRB104 14637 AAS 27779 b1    on a premise of land that is an energy production zone; and 2        (3) the project owner complies with subsections (b) 3    and (c) of this Section. 4    (b) No later than 270 days before beginning any 5construction to which subsection (a) of this Section applies, 6a project owner shall provide notice of the construction to 7the local authority with planning authority for the premise of 8land on which the construction will occur. The notice must 9include all of the following information with regard to the 10construction and the electric generation facility to be 11constructed: 12        (1) A comprehensive description of the electric 13    generation facility, including the following: 14            (A) the planned generation capacity of the 15        electric generation facility, expressed in megawatts; 16            (B) the energy source or technology that will be 17        used by the electric generation facility to generate 18        electricity; and 19            (C) the expected operational lifespan of the 20        electric generation facility. 21        (2) The expected date on which the construction will 22    begin. 23        (3) The expected date on which the electric generation 24    facility will begin operation. 25        (4) Whether the electric generation facility will 26    provide retail electric service, wholesale electric   SB2686- 5 -LRB104 14637 AAS 27779 b1    service, or both. 2        (5) The project owner's plan for the eventual 3    decommissioning of the electric generation facility. 4        (6) If construction of the electric generation 5    facility will entail decommissioning an existing electric 6    generation facility that is located on the premise of land 7    on which the electric generation facility will be located, 8    the project owner's plan for decommissioning the existing 9    electric generation facility, including financial 10    assurances for the decommissioning. 11        (7) A detailed site plan that includes the location of 12    the following within or adjacent to the premise of land on 13    which the electric generation facility will be 14    constructed: 15            (A) The structures associated with the electric 16        generation facility. 17            (B) Any of the following that are located on the 18        premise of land on which the electric generation 19        facility will be constructed: 20                (i) any existing electric generation facility 21            and any structures associated with the existing 22            electric generation facility; or 23                (ii) any surface or underground mine and any 24            structures associated with the surface or 25            underground mine. 26            (C) Existing and proposed access roads.   SB2686- 6 -LRB104 14637 AAS 27779 b1            (D) Regulated drains or ditches. 2            (E) Flood plains. 3            (F) Wetlands. 4            (G) Historic sites or other areas of cultural or 5        environmental significance. 6        (8) An economic development plan detailing the 7    expected economic effect of the electric generation 8    facility on the unit of local government within which the 9    electric generation facility will be located, including 10    all of the following: 11            (A) The anticipated number and types of jobs to be 12        created during the construction of the electric 13        generation facility and in the operation of the 14        electric generation facility. 15            (B) The estimated property tax revenue the 16        electric generation facility will produce for the unit 17        of local government. 18            (C) An estimate of the overall cost to the unit of 19        local government and the overall effect on the unit of 20        local government's revenue associated with the 21        electric generation facility. 22        (9) A safety, security, and emergency response plan 23    describing measures to ensure the following with regard to 24    the construction and operation of the electric generation 25    facility: 26            (A) site security and safety;   SB2686- 7 -LRB104 14637 AAS 27779 b1            (B) coordination with the unit of local 2        government's services; and 3            (C) the safeguarding of the public. 4    (c) No later than 60 days after a project owner's 5provision of notice under subsection (b) of this Section, the 6project owner shall hold a public hearing in the unit of local 7government in which the electric generation facility will be 8located, during which the project owner shall provide 9information to the public and receive public comment regarding 10the electric generation facility and the construction of the 11electric generation facility. The project owner shall publish 12notice of the date, time, location, and subject of the public 13hearing. 14    (d) After providing notice to a local authority under 15subsection (b) of this Section, a project owner shall notify 16the local authority regarding any substantive changes in the 17information provided by the project owner under subsection (b) 18of this Section that occur before construction begins on the 19electric generation facility to which the notice pertains. 20    Section 15. Local authority. This Act may not be construed 21to increase or modify the authority of a local authority or a 22unit of local government to regulate the siting, construction, 23or deployment of an electric generation facility that is not 24located in an energy production zone. 25    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon   SB2686- 8 -LRB104 14637 AAS 27779 b1becoming law.